North Carolina, session 2025, HB996.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 143C-4-6 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143C-4-6. General Fund operating budget size limited.
(a) Size Limitation. – Except as otherwise provided in this section, the General Fund
operating budget each fiscal year shall not be greater than seven percent (7%) six percent (6%)
of the projected total State personal income for that fiscal year.
(a1) Extraordinary Exceedance of Budget Size Limitation. – In each fiscal year, funds in
excess of the size limitation set forth in subsection (a) of this section shall be available for
expenditure upon a two-thirds vote of the membership of the Senate and the House of
Representatives present and voting.
…."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025, and applies to General Fund
operating budgets adopted by the General Assembly on or after that date.
*H996-v-1*